trunk/apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="g/ervel__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ervel</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvet</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvan</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvez</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alv</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvomp</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvit</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvont</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alver</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alven</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alves</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alve</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvemp</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvec’h</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvent</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alved</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvis</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjout</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvas</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjomp</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjoc’h</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjont</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjod</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvin</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvi</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvo</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvimp</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvot</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvint</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvor</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvfen</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvfes</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvfe</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvfemp</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvfec’h</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvfent</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvfed</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjen</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjes</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvje</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjemp</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjec’h</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjent</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvjed</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alv</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvomp</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvit</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alvent</l>
          <r>ervel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
	
	
	
	

    <e lm="gervel"><par n="initial-g"/><i></i><par n="g/ervel__vblex"/></e>
